Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6504
Additional definitions.

Any term defined in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 or in the ImagiNE Nebraska Act has the same meaning in the Key Employer and Jobs Retention Act unless the context or the express language of the Key Employer and Jobs Retention Act requires a different meaning.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 47.

ImagiNE Nebraska Act, see section 77-6801.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.